California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(ii) Any other conditions, such as a minimum age qualification, a financial qualification, or a requirement that if the recipient is married or in a registered domestic partnership, both spouses must be present in order to receive the incentive. Any financial
 qualifications shall be stated with a specificity sufficient to enable the recipient to reasonably determine his or her eligibility.

(C) A statement that the owner or provider identified pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) reserves the right to provide a raincheck, or a substitute or like incentive, if those rights are reserved.

(D) A statement that a recipient who receives an offered incentive may request and will receive evidence showing that the incentive provided matches the incentive randomly or otherwise selected for distribution to that recipient.

(E) All other rules, terms, and conditions of the offer, plan, or program.

(b) It is unlawful for any person making an offer subject to subdivision (a), or any employee, agent, or independent
 contractor employed or authorized by that person, to offer any incentive when the person knows or has reason to know that the offered item will not be available in a sufficient quantity based upon the reasonably anticipated response to the offer.

(c) It is unlawful for any person making an offer subject to subdivision (a), or any employee, agent, or independent contractor employed or authorized by that person, to fail to provide any offered incentive which any recipient who has responded to the offer in the manner specified therein, who has performed the requirements disclosed therein, and who has met the qualifications described therein, is entitled to receive, unless the offered incentive is not reasonably available and the offer discloses the reservation of a right to provide a raincheck, or a like or substitute incentive, if the offered incentive is unavailable.

(d) If the
 person making an offer subject to subdivision (a) is unable to provide an offered incentive because of limitations of supply, quantity, or quality that were not reasonably foreseeable or controllable by the person making the offer, the person making the offer shall inform the recipient of the recipient’s right to receive a raincheck for the incentive offered, unless the person making the offer knows or has reasonable basis for knowing that the incentive will not be reasonably available and shall inform the recipient of the recipient’s right to at least one of the following additional options:

(1) The person making the offer will provide a like incentive of equivalent or greater retail value or a raincheck therefor.

(2) The person making the offer will provide a substitute incentive of equivalent or greater retail value.

(3) The person making the offer will provide a raincheck for the like or substitute incentive.

(e) If a raincheck is provided, the person making an offer subject to subdivision (a) shall, within a reasonable time, and in no event later than 80 days, deliver the agreed incentive to the recipient’s address without additional cost or obligation to the recipient, unless the incentive for which the raincheck is provided remains unavailable because of limitations of supply, quantity, or quality not reasonably foreseeable or controllable by the person making the offer. In that case, the person making the offer shall, not later than 30 days after the expiration of the 80 days, deliver a like incentive of equal or greater retail value or, if an incentive is not reasonably available to the person making the offer, a substitute incentive of equal or greater retail value.

(f) Upon the request of a recipient who has received or claims a right to receive any offered incentive, the person making an offer subject to subdivision (a) shall furnish to the person sufficient evidence showing that the incentive provided matches the incentive randomly or otherwise selected for distribution to that recipient.

(g) It is unlawful for any person making an offer subject to subdivision (a), or any employee, agent, or independent contractor employed or authorized by that person, to:

(1) Use any printing styles, graphics, layouts, text, colors, or formats on envelopes or on the offer that imply, create an appearance, or would lead a reasonable person to believe, that the offer originates from or is issued by or on behalf of a government or public agency, public utility, public organization, insurance company, credit reporting agency, bill collecting
 company, or law firm, unless the same is true.

(2) Misrepresent the size, quantity, identity, value, or qualities of any incentive.

(3) Misrepresent in any manner the odds of receiving any particular incentive.

(4) Represent directly or by implication that the number of participants has been significantly limited or that any person has been selected to receive a particular incentive unless that is the fact.

(5) Label any offer a notice of termination or notice of cancellation.

(6) Misrepresent, in any manner, the offer, plan, or program or the affiliation, connection, association, or contractual relationship between the person making the offer and the owner or provider, if they are not the
 same.

(h) If the major incentives are awarded or given at random, by the assignment of a number to the incentives, that number shall be actually assigned by the party contractually responsible for doing so. The person making an offer subject to subdivision (a) hereof, or the agent, employee, or independent contractor employed or authorized by that person, if any, shall maintain, for a period of one year after the date the offer is made, the records that show that the winning numbers or opportunity to receive the major incentives have been deposited in the mail or otherwise made available to recipients in accordance with the odds statement provided pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) hereof. The records shall be made available to the Attorney General within 30 days after written request therefor. Postal receipt records, affidavits of mailing, or a list of winners or recipients of the major incentives shall be deemed
 to satisfy the requirements of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 2.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

17537.2.

The following, when used as part of an advertising plan or program defined in Section 17537.1, are deceptive and constitute unfair trade practices:

(a) When, in order to utilize the incentive, the recipient is requested to pay any money to any person or entity named or referred to in the offer, or to purchase, rent, or otherwise pay that person or entity for any product or service including a deposit, whether returnable or not, whether payment is for an item, a service, shipping, handling, insurance or payment for anything.

Notwithstanding the preceding paragraph, when the offered incentive is a certificate or coupon redeemable for transportation, accommodations, recreation, vacation, entertainment, or like services, the offer may place a
 condition on the use of the incentive which requires the recipient to pay directly to the transportation company, the accommodation, recreation, vacation or entertainment facility, or similar direct provider of like services, a refundable deposit, not to exceed fifty dollars ($50), to reserve space availability or admission, only if the deposit shall be returned in United States dollars immediately upon the recipient’s arrival at the location of the provider to whom the recipient paid the deposit. If the incentive is such a certificate or coupon, and if government-imposed taxes directly related to the service being provided are not included in the incentive, the offer itself, in close proximity to the description of the incentive which is evidenced by the certificate or coupon, shall disclose those government-imposed taxes which will be the recipient’s responsibility and the approximate dollar amount of those taxes. A deposit from the recipient may be collected to cover the cost of those government-imposed
 taxes.

(b) Stating or implying in the offer that the recipient is one of a selected group to receive a particular incentive or one or more of a group of incentives, without clearly and conspicuously disclosing in close proximity to the statement or implied statement of selection the total number of persons in that select group or the odds of receiving the incentive or incentives. Statements of selection which require such disclosure include such phrases as “you are a finalist,” “we are sending this to a limited number of people,” “either you or another named person has won the major prize,” “if you do not respond, your incentive will be given to someone else.”

(c) Stating or implying in the offer that the recipient is likely to receive one or more of the offered incentives because other named people have already received other named incentives, unless the offer clearly and
 conspicuously discloses in close proximity to the statement the recipient’s odds of receiving the identified incentive.

(d) When the solicitation states or implies that the recipient is likely to receive an incentive which has a normal retail price which is higher than that of another named incentive unless that statement is true. For purposes of this section, a list of incentives implies that the incentives are in descending or ascending order of value unless the solicitation clearly and conspicuously negates the implication in close proximity to the list.

(e) Describing an incentive or incentives in an untrue or misleading manner. Untrue or misleading descriptions include those which imply that the incentive being offered is of greater fair market value or of a different kind or nature than a recipient would be led to believe from a reasonable reading of the offer, or which
 lists the recipient’s name in close proximity to a specific incentive unless the offer clearly and conspicuously discloses immediately next to or immediately under or above the recipient’s name the recipient’s odds of receiving the specific incentive.

(f) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to an incentive constituting an opportunity to stay at a hotel or other resort accommodations at a discount from the standard rate for the hotel or resort accommodations, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The fee to utilize the incentive and the requirement, if any, to attend a sales presentation are clearly and conspicuously disclosed in close proximity to the description of the offered incentive.

(2) A statement appears in close proximity to the description of the offered incentive and in substantially the following
 form: The recipient is responsible for payment of any government-imposed taxes directly related to the service being provided and any personal expenses incurred when utilizing this offer.

(3) The accommodations to be occupied by the recipient of the incentive are within a 20-mile radius of the property on which the accommodations offered for sale are located or, if not within that radius, the accommodations offered for sale are managed and operated by the same person as, an affiliate (as defined in Section 150 of the Corporations Code) of, or a franchisee (as defined in Section 20002) of, the manager and operator of the accommodations to be occupied, and the manager and operator of the accommodations offered for sale or the manager and operator of the accommodations to be occupied is an issuer or subsidiary of an issuer that has a security listed on a national securities exchange, and the exchange has been certified by rule or order of the
 Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation under subdivision (o) of Section 25100 of the Corporations Code. A subsidiary of an issuer that qualifies under this paragraph does not itself qualify under this paragraph unless not less than 60 percent of the voting power of its shares is owned by the qualifying issuer or issuers.

(4) If the incentive is offered in conjunction with any additional incentive or incentives or as one or more of a group of incentives, the offer of that additional incentive or incentives shall comply with Section 17537.1 and the following:

(A) The additional incentive or incentives are typically and customarily included in a vacation package and may include, but not be limited to, transportation, dining, entertainment, or recreation.

(B) The fee and additional requirements, if any, to
 use the additional incentive or incentives are clearly and conspicuously disclosed in close proximity to the description of the offer of them.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 16.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

17537.3.

The following acts are prohibited:

(a) For any person to offer as part of an advertising plan or program, promotional offers of smokeless tobacco products which require proof of purchase of a smokeless tobacco product unless it carries a designation that the offer is not available to persons under 21 years of age. Each promotional offer shall include in any mail-in coupon a statement requesting purchasers to verify that
 the purchaser is 21 years of age or older.

(b) For any person to honor mail-in and telephone requests for promotional offers of smokeless tobacco products unless appropriate efforts are made to ascertain that a purchaser is over 21 years of age. For purposes of this subdivision, appropriate efforts to ascertain the age of a purchaser includes, but is not limited to, requests for a purchaser’s birth date.

(c) For any person by any means, as part of an advertising plan or program, to distribute free samples of smokeless tobacco products within a two-block radius of any premises or facilities whose primary purpose is directed toward persons under 21 years of age including, but not limited to, schools, clubhouses, and youth centers, when those premises are being used for their primary purposes.

(d) For any person to
 distribute, as part of any advertising plan or program, unsolicited samples of smokeless tobacco products through a mail campaign.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 8, Sec. 1.   (SB 7 2x)   Effective June 9, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

17537.4.

If the person making an offer subject to Section 17537 or to subdivision (a) of Section 17537.1, or any employee, agent, or independent contractor employed or authorized by that person, violates any provision of Section 17537, 17537.1, or 17537.2, the recipient of the offer who is damaged by the violation may bring a civil action against the person making the offer for, and may be awarded, treble damages. The court may award reasonable attorneys’ fees to the prevailing party.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 17537.2 by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1529, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

17537.5.

(a) It is unlawful for any person soliciting a sale or order for energy conservation products or services, including over the Internet, to do any of the following:

(1) Make false claims of affiliation or association with an electrical or gas corporation or municipally owned and operated electrical or gas utility or its energy conservation programs.

(2) Falsely represent that the purchase of an energy conservation
 service or the purchase or installation of an energy conservation product is required by law.

(3) Misrepresent the nature of the purchaser’s obligation for the purchase price of the energy conservation products or services.

(4) Misrepresent the tax consequences of purchasing energy conservation products or services.

(b) Any person, firm, corporation, partnership or association, and any employee or agent thereof who violates this section (1) in the course of solicitation of a sale or order at a residence; (2) by telephone; or (3) by any other method or at any other location, including over the Internet, shall be liable for the damages provided by subdivision (c) of Section 17500.3, in addition to all other penalties provided by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 599, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

17537.6.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to make any untrue or misleading statements in any manner in connection with the offering or performance of a homestead filing service. For the purpose of this section, an “untrue or misleading statement” means and includes any representation that any of the following is true:

(1) The preparation or recordation of a homestead declaration will in any manner prevent the forced sale of a judgment debtor’s dwelling.

(2) The preparation
 or recordation of a homestead declaration will prevent the foreclosure of a mortgage, deed of trust, or mechanic’s lien.

(3) Any of the provisions relating to the homestead exemption set forth in Article 4 (commencing with Section 704.710) of Chapter 4 of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure are available only to persons who prepare or record a homestead declaration.

(4) A homestead declaration is in any way related to the obtaining of any applicable homeowner’s exemption to real property taxes.

(5) The preparation or recordation of a homestead declaration is required by law in any manner.

(6) The offeror of the homestead filing service has a file or record covering a person to whom a solicitation is made.

(7) The offeror of the homestead filing service is, or is affiliated with, any charitable or public service entity unless the offeror is, or is affiliated with, a charitable organization which has qualified for a tax exemption under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(8) The offeror of the homestead filing service is, or is affiliated with, any governmental entity. A violation of this paragraph includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(A) The misleading use of any governmental seal, emblem, or other similar symbol.

(B) The use of a business name including the word “homestead” and the word “agency,” “bureau,” “department,” “division,” “federal,” “state,” “county,” “city,” “municipal,” “California,” or “United States,” or the name of any
 city, county, city and county, or any governmental entity.

(C) The use of an envelope that simulates an envelope containing a government check, tax bill, or government notice or an envelope which otherwise has the capacity to be confused with, or mistaken for, an envelope sent by a governmental entity.

(b)(1) It is unlawful to offer to perform a homestead filing service without making the following disclosure:

THIS HOMESTEAD FILING SERVICE IS NOT ASSOCIATED WITH ANY GOVERNMENT AGENCY.

YOU DO NOT HAVE TO RECORD A HOMESTEAD DECLARATION.

RECORDING A HOMESTEAD DECLARATION DOES NOT PROTECT YOUR HOME AGAINST FORCED SALE BY A CREDITOR. YOU MAY WISH TO CONSULT A LAWYER ABOUT THE BENEFITS OF RECORDING A HOMESTEAD DECLARATION.

IF YOU WANT TO RECORD A HOMESTEAD, YOU CAN FILL OUT A HOMESTEAD DECLARATION FORM BY YOURSELF, HAVE YOUR SIGNATURE NOTARIZED, AND HAVE THE FORM RECORDED BY THE COUNTY RECORDER.

(2) The disclosure specified in paragraph (1) shall be placed at the top of each page of every advertisement or promotional material disseminated by an offeror of a homestead filing service and shall be printed in 12-point boldface type enclosed in a box formed by a heavy line.

(3) The disclosure specified in paragraph (1) shall be recited at the beginning of every oral solicitation and every broadcast advertisement and shall be delivered in printed form as prescribed by paragraph (2) before the time each person who responds to the oral solicitation or broadcast advertisement is obligated to pay for any service.

(c) In addition to any other service, every offeror of a homestead filing service shall deliver each notarized homestead declaration to the appropriate county recorder for recordation as soon as needed or required by a homestead declarant, but no later than 10 days after the homestead declaration is notarized. The offeror of the homestead filing service shall pay all fees charged in connection with the notarization and recordation of the homestead declaration.

(d) No offeror of a homestead filing service shall charge, demand, or collect any money until after the homestead declaration is recorded. The total amount charged, demanded, or collected by an offeror of a homestead filing service, including all fees for notarization and recordation, shall not exceed twenty-five dollars ($25).

(e) For the purposes of this section,
 the following definitions apply:

(1) “Homestead filing service” means any service performed or offered to be performed for compensation in connection with the preparation or completion of a homestead declaration or in connection with the assistance in any manner of another person to prepare or complete a homestead declaration. “Homestead filing service” does not include any service performed by an attorney at law authorized to practice in this state for a client who has retained that attorney or an employee of that attorney acting under the attorney’s direction and supervision. 

(2) A “homestead declaration” has the meaning described in Article 5 (commencing with Section 704.910) of Chapter 4 of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 974, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

17537.7.

Except as to communications described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (n) of Section 11713.1 of the Vehicle Code, it is unlawful for any person to use the terms “invoice,” “dealer invoice,” “wholesale price,” or similar terms that refer to a dealer’s cost for a motor vehicle in an advertisement for the sale or lease of a vehicle, or advertise that the selling price of a vehicle is above, below, or at either of the following:

(a) The manufacturer’s or distributor’s invoice or selling price to a
 dealer.

(b) A dealer’s cost.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 585, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

17537.8.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to make any untrue or misleading statements in any manner in connection with the offering or performance of a homeowners’ exemption filing service. For the purpose of this section, an “untrue or misleading statement” includes, but is not limited to, any representation that any of the following is true:

(1) A fee is required in order to receive the homeowners’ exemption.

(2) The
 offeror of the homeowners’ exemption filing service has a file or record covering a person to whom a solicitation is made.

(3) The offeror of the homeowners’ exemption filing service is, or is affiliated with, any governmental entity. A violation of this paragraph includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(A) The misleading use of any governmental seal, emblem, or other similar symbol.

(B) The use of a business name including the word “homeowners’ exemption” or “exemption” and the word “assessor,” “auditor,” “agency,” “bureau,” “department,” “division,” “federal,” “state,” “county,” “city,” or “municipal,” or the name of any city, county, city and county, or any governmental entity.

(C) The use of an envelope that simulates an envelope containing
 a government check, tax bill, or government notice or an envelope that otherwise has the capacity to be confused with, or mistaken for, an envelope sent by a governmental entity.

(D) The use of an envelope or outside cover or wrapper in which a solicitation is mailed that does not bear on its face in capital letters and in conspicuous and legible type the following notice: “THIS IS NOT A GOVERNMENT DOCUMENT.”

(b) (1) It is unlawful to offer to perform a homeowners’ exemption filing service without making the following disclosure:“THIS HOMEOWNERS’ EXEMPTION FILING SERVICE IS NOT ASSOCIATED WITH ANY GOVERNMENT AGENCY. YOU CAN OBTAIN AND FILE A HOMEOWNERS’ EXEMPTION CLAIM FORM, AT NO COST, WITH THE COUNTY ASSESSOR’S OFFICE.”

(2) The
 disclosures specified in paragraph (1) shall be placed at the top of each page of every advertisement or promotional material disseminated by an offeror of a homeowners’ exemption filing service and shall be printed in 12-point boldface type enclosed in a box formed by a heavy line.

(3) The disclosure specified in paragraph (1) shall be recited at the beginning of every oral solicitation and every broadcast advertisement and shall be delivered in printed form as prescribed by paragraph (2) before the time each person who responds to the oral solicitation or broadcast advertisement is obligated to pay for the service.

(c) No offeror of a homeowners’ exemption filing service shall charge, demand, or collect any money until after the homeowners’ exemption is filed with the county assessor. The total amount charged, demanded, or collected by an offeror of a homeowners’ exemption
 filing service shall not exceed twenty-five dollars ($25).

(d) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Homeowners’ exemption filing service” means any service performed or offered to be performed for compensation in connection with the preparation or completion of a homeowners’ exemption claim or in connection with the assistance in any manner of another person to prepare or complete a homeowners’ exemption claim.

(2) “Homeowners’ exemption” has the meaning described in Section 218 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 249, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17537.9.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to make any untrue or misleading statements in any manner in connection with the offering or performance of an assessment reduction filing service. For the purposes of this section, an “untrue or misleading statement” includes, but is not limited to, any representation that any of the following is true:

(1) The preparation of a request for review or an assessment
 appeal application will result in a guaranteed reduction of property taxes.

(2) A fee is required in order for the county to process a reduction of a property’s assessed value where the county has no applicable fee.

(3) The offeror of the assessment reduction filing service will be physically present to represent the person to whom a solicitation is made before county assessor staff, an assessment appeals board, county board of equalization, or an assessment hearing officer, unless the fee includes this service.

(4) The offeror of the assessment reduction filing service will prepare or complete informal assessor review data or prepare or complete the application in full, with the exception of the property owner’s signature, on behalf of the person to whom a solicitation is made, unless the fee includes this
 service.

(5) The offeror of the assessment reduction filing service has a file or record covering a person to whom a solicitation is made.

(6) The offeror of the assessment reduction filing service is, or is affiliated with, any governmental entity. A violation of this paragraph includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(A) The misleading use of any governmental seal, emblem, or other similar symbol.

(B) The use of a business name including the word “appeal” or “tax” and the word “agency,” “assessor,” “board,” “bureau,” “commission,” “department,” “division,” “federal,” “state,” “county,” “city,” or “municipal,” or the name of any city, county, city and county, or any governmental entity.

(C) The use of an envelope that simulates an envelope containing a government check, tax bill, or government notice or an envelope that otherwise has the capacity to be confused with, or mistaken for, an envelope sent by a governmental entity.

(D) The use of an envelope or outside cover or wrapper in which a solicitation is mailed that does not bear on its face in capital letters and in conspicuous and legible type the following notice:
“THIS IS NOT A GOVERNMENT DOCUMENT.”
(7) A late fee is required if the person to whom the solicitation is sent fails to respond to the offeror of the assessment reduction filing service by a date stated in the solicitation.

(b) (1) It is unlawful to offer to perform an assessment reduction filing service without making the following disclosure:
“THIS ASSESSMENT REDUCTION FILING SERVICE IS NOT ASSOCIATED WITH ANY GOVERNMENT AGENCY. IF YOU DISAGREE WITH THE ASSESSED VALUE OF YOUR PROPERTY, YOU HAVE THE RIGHT TO AN INFORMAL ASSESSMENT REVIEW, AT NO COST, BY CONTACTING THE ASSESSOR’S OFFICE DIRECTLY. IF YOU AND THE ASSESSOR CANNOT AGREE TO THE VALUE OF THE PROPERTY OR IF YOU DO NOT WISH TO CONTACT THE ASSESSOR YOU CAN OBTAIN AND FILE AN APPLICATION FOR CHANGED ASSESSMENT WITH THE COUNTY BOARD OF EQUALIZATION OR ASSESSMENT APPEALS BOARD ON YOUR OWN BEHALF. AN APPEALS BOARD HAS THE AUTHORITY TO RAISE PROPERTY VALUES (BUT IN NO CASE HIGHER THAN THE PROPOSITION 13 PROTECTED VALUE) AS WELL AS TO LOWER PROPERTY VALUES.”
(2) The disclosures specified in paragraph (1) shall be placed at the top of each page of every advertisement or promotional material disseminated by an offeror of an assessment reduction filing service and shall be printed in not less than 12-point boldface font type that is at least 2-point boldface font type sizes larger than the next largest print on the page and enclosed in a box formed by a heavy line.

(3) The disclosure specified in paragraph (1) shall be recited at the beginning of every oral solicitation and every broadcast advertisement and shall be delivered in printed form as prescribed by paragraph (2) before the time each person who responds to the oral solicitation or broadcast advertisement is obligated to pay for the service.

(c) (1) No offeror of an assessment reduction filing service shall charge, demand, or collect any money
 in connection with a request for review until after the request is filed with the assessor.

(2) No offeror of an assessment reduction filing service shall charge, demand, or collect any money in connection with an assessment appeal application until after the application is filed with the clerk of the assessment appeals board.

(d) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Assessment reduction filing service” means any service performed or offered to be performed for compensation in connection with the preparation or completion of an application or request of any kind for reduction in assessment of residential property or in connection with the assistance in any manner of another person to either (A) prepare or complete an application or request of any kind for reduction in assessment of
 residential property or (B) provide comparable sales information in connection with an application or request for reduction in assessment of residential property.

(2) “Assessment appeal application” has the meaning described in Section 1603 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(e) (1) It is unlawful for an offeror of an assessment reduction filing service to file a request or application of any kind for reduction in assessment without first obtaining a written authorization from the property owner.

(2) A true and correct copy of the written authorization shall be submitted with any request or application for reduction in assessment. The offeror shall maintain the original written authorization for a period of three years and shall make it available for inspection and copying within 24 hours of a
 request without a warrant to law enforcement, the Attorney General, district attorney, or city attorney.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 269, Sec. 2.   (AB 75)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

17537.10.

(a) It is unlawful for any person, firm, corporation, association, or any other business entity to make any untrue or misleading statements in any manner in connection with the offering or performance of a grant deed copy service. For the purpose of this section, an “untrue or misleading statement” includes, but is not limited to, any representation, with regard to property identified by its address or assessor’s parcel number, that any of the following is true:

(1) That due to property foreclosures and loan modifications in the county where the property is located, the property owner should obtain a copy of his or her grant deed or other record of title.

(2) That a governmental entity, or any other entity that includes in its name words that could lead a person to reasonably believe that the entity is affiliated with government, has recommended that a property owner should have a copy of his or her grant deed or other record of title.

(3) That the offeror of the grant deed copy service is, or is affiliated with, any governmental entity. A violation of this paragraph includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(A) The misleading use of any governmental seal, emblem, or other similar symbol.

(B) The use of a business name including the words “title” or “grant deed” or “public record” and the word “agency,” “bureau,” “department,” “division,” “federal,” “state,” “county,” “city,” or “municipal,” or the name of any city, county, city and county, or any governmental entity.

(C) The use of an envelope that simulates an envelope containing a government check, tax bill, or government notice or an envelope that otherwise has the capacity to be confused with, or mistaken for, an envelope sent by a governmental entity.

(D) The use of an envelope or outside cover or wrapper in which a solicitation is mailed that does not bear on its face in capital letters and in conspicuous and legible type the following notice: “THIS IS NOT A GOVERNMENT APPROVED OR AUTHORIZED DOCUMENT.”

(4) That there is a fee payment deadline to obtain a copy of a property owner’s grant deed or other record of title.

(b) (1) It is unlawful to offer to perform a grant deed copy service without making the following disclosure:
“THIS SERVICE TO OBTAIN A COPY OF YOUR GRANT DEED OR OTHER RECORD OF TITLE IS NOT ASSOCIATED WITH ANY GOVERNMENTAL AGENCY. YOU CAN OBTAIN A COPY OF YOUR GRANT DEED OR OTHER RECORD OF TITLE FROM THE COUNTY RECORDER IN THE COUNTY WHERE YOUR PROPERTY IS LOCATED FOR [AMOUNT OF FEE FOR THE COPY OF A GRANT DEED OR OTHER RECORD OF TITLE IN THAT COUNTY].”
(2) The disclosure specified in paragraph (1) shall be placed at the top of each page of every advertisement
 or promotional material disseminated by an offeror of a grant deed copy service and shall be printed in 14-point boldface type enclosed in a box formed by a heavy line.

(3) The disclosure specified in paragraph (1) shall be recited at the beginning of every oral solicitation and every broadcast advertisement and shall be delivered in printed form as prescribed by paragraph (2) before the time each person who responds to the oral solicitation or broadcast advertisement is obligated to pay for the service.

(c) For purposes of this section, “grant deed copy service” means a service offered by a person, firm, corporation, association, or any other business entity, through a mailed solicitation to a property owner, to obtain, for compensation, a copy of the property owner’s grant deed or other record of title.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 533, Sec. 1.   (AB 1373)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

17537.11.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to offer a coupon that is in any manner untrue or misleading.

(b) It is unlawful for any person to offer a coupon described as “free” or as a “gift,” “prize,” or other similar term if (1) the recipient of the coupon is required to pay money or buy any goods or services to obtain or use the coupon, and (2) the person offering the coupon or anyone honoring the coupon made the majority of his or her sales in the preceding year in connection with
 one or more “free,” “gift,” “prize,” or similarly described coupons.

(c) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Coupon” includes any coupon, certificate, document, discount, or similar matter that purports to entitle the user of the coupon to obtain goods or services for free or for a special or reduced price.

(2) “Sale” includes lease or rent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 135, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

17537.12.

(a) This section shall be known and may be cited as the Truth in Music Advertising Act.

(b) As used in this section, the following terms have the following meanings unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

(1) “Performing group” means a vocal or instrumental group seeking to use the name of another group that has previously
 released a commercial sound recording under that name.

(2) “Person” means the performing group or its promoter, manager, or agent. “Person” does not include the performance venue or its owners, managers, or operators, unless the performance venue owns or produces the performing group, or knew or should have known that the performing group does not have a legal right to perform.

(3) “Recording group” means a vocal or instrumental group, at least one of whose members has previously released a commercial sound recording under that group’s name and in which the member or members have a legal right by virtue of use or operation under the group name without having abandoned the name or affiliation with the group.

(4) “Sound recording” means a work that results from the fixation on a material object of a series of musical,
 spoken, or other sounds regardless of the nature of the material object, such as a disk, tape, or other phonorecord, in which the sounds are embodied.

(c) No person shall advertise or conduct a live musical performance or production through the use of a false, deceptive, or misleading affiliation, connection, or association between a performing group and a recording group unless any of the following apply:

(1) The performing group is the authorized registrant and owner of a federal service mark for the group registered in the United States Patent and Trademark Office.

(2) At least one member of the performing group was previously a member of the recording group and has a legal right by virtue of use or operation under the group name without having abandoned the name or affiliation of the group.

(3) The live musical performance or production is identified in all advertising and promotion as a salute or tribute, and the name of the vocal or instrumental group performing is not so closely related or similar to that used by the recording group that it would tend to confuse or mislead the public.

(4) The advertising does not relate to a live musical performance or production taking place in this state.

(5) The performance or production is expressly authorized by the recording group.

(d) (1) Any person who violates any of the provisions of this section shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per violation, as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 17206. An action for a civil
 penalty shall be brought by a public prosecutor as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 17206 and shall be enforceable as a civil judgment.

(2) Any person who violates any of the provisions of this section shall be subject to the equitable remedies described in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17200) of Part 2.

(3) Nothing in this section shall preclude prosecution of a violation of this section under any other provision of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 140, Sec. 20.   (AB 1164)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

17537.15.
